fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VII-v
@P.infl.VII-v@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VII-n
@P.infl.VII-n@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VII-n-SG
@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VII-v-SG
@P.infl.VII-v@@P.number.SG@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VII-n-PL
@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.PL@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VII-v-PL
@P.infl.VII-v@@P.number.PL@ VII_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-ae
@P.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-ae-PL
@P.infl.VAI-ae@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-io
@P.infl.VAI-io@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-io-PL
@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-n
@P.infl.VAI-n@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-n-PL
@P.infl.VAI-n@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-m
@P.infl.VAI-m@ VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VAI-m-PL
@P.infl.VAI-m@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Class ;

! VTI verbs

LEXICON VTI-ae
@P.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI-ae-PL
@P.infl.VTI-ae@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI-io
@P.infl.VTI-io@ VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI-io-PL
@P.infl.VTI-io@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI-m
@P.infl.VTI-m@ VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI-m-PL
@P.infl.VTI-m@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Class ;

! VTA verbs

LEXICON VTA
@P.infl.VTA@ VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTA-PL
@P.infl.VTA@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTA-t
@P.infl.VTA-t@ VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTA-t-PL
@P.infl.VTA-t@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTA-i
@P.infl.VTA-i@ VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTA-i-PL
@P.infl.VTA-i@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Class ;

!! Verb derivation

! VII derivation

LEXICON VII_Class
+V+II:0 VII_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VII_Diminutive
0 VII_Derivation ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-n@+Der/Dim+V+II:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-n@%>s^DIMi VII_Derivation "weight: 10" ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-v@+Der/Dim+V+II:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-v@%>s^DIMi VII_Derivation "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VII_Derivation
0 VII_Inflection ;

! VAI derivation

LEXICON VAI_Class
+V+AI:0 VAI_ComitativeTheme ;

LEXICON VAI_ComitativeTheme
@D.comitative.COM@ VAI_Diminutive ;
! @R.comitative.NULL@ VAI_Diminutive ;
@R.comitative.COM@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@P.infl.VTA@%^COM%>i2m VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VAI_Diminutive
0 VAI_Derivation ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-ae@@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Dim+V+AI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-ae@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>s^DIMi VAI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-io@@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Dim+V+AI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-io@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>s^DIMi VAI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-n@@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Dim+V+AI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-n@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>is^DIMi VAI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-m@@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Dim+V+AI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-m@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>as^DIMi VAI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VAI_Derivation
0 VAI_Inflection ;
0 VAI_Derivation2 ;
@R.agent.AGENT@@C.agent@ VAI_AgentiveSuffix ;

LEXICON VAI_Derivation2
@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@+Der/Pass:@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@%>m^V2VVakan3 VII_Class "weight: 10" ; ! VII-1
@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Hab:@P.infl.VAI-io@%>ski VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTI-m@+Der/Trans:@P.infl.VTI-m@%>st VTI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Bnf:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>staw VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Caus:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>h VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
!! Nominalization
! Productive nominalized -win and variants
@R.infl.VAI-ae@@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Nom:@R.infl.VAI-ae@@R.noun.Indep@%>win NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Nom:@R.infl.VAI-io@@R.noun.Indep@%>win NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Nom:@R.infl.VAI-n@@R.noun.Indep@%>iwin NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Nom:@R.infl.VAI-m@@R.noun.Indep@%>amo%>win NI "weight: 10" ;
! Older nominalizer -n
@D.infl.VAI-n@@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Nom2:@D.infl.VAI-n@@R.noun.Indep@%>n2 NI "weight: 10" ;
! Instrument with -âkan
@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Ins2:@R.noun.Indep@%>â^INSkan NI "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VAI_AgentiveSuffix
! Agentive o- ... -(amo)w
@R.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VAI-ae@%>w NA "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VAI-io@%>w NA "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VAI-n@%>iw NA "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VAI-m@%>m%>ow NA "weight: 10" ;

! VTI derivation

LEXICON VTI_Class
+V+TI:0 VTI_ComitativeTheme ;

LEXICON VTI_ComitativeTheme
@D.comitative.COM@ VTI_Diminutive ;
! @R.comitative.NULL@ VTI_Diminutive ;
@R.comitative.COM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@%>am%>o^COM%>i2m VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@R.comitative.COM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@%^COM%>i2m VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VTI_Diminutive
0 VTI_Derivation ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+Der/Dim+V+TI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>as^DIMi VTI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+Der/Dim+V+TI:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>s^DIMi VTI_Derivation "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VTI_Derivation
0 VTI_Inflection ;
0 VTI_Derivation2 ;
@R.agent.AGENT@@C.agent@ VTI_AgentiveSuffix ;

LEXICON VTI_Derivation2
@P.infl.VII-v@+Der/Pass:@P.infl.VII-v@%>i2^T2Ckâtê VII_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Antip:@P.infl.VAI-ae@%>i2^T2Ckê VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+Der/Hab:@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>aski VTI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+Der/Hab:@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>ski VTI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Bnf:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>amaw VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Caus:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>i2h VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Caus:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>amih VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Caus:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>amoh VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
! Nominalization
@R.noun.Indep@@D.infl.VTI-m@+Der/Nom:@R.noun.Indep@@D.infl.VTI-m@%>win NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.noun.Indep@@R.infl.VTI-m@+Der/Nom:@R.noun.Indep@@R.infl.VTI-m@%>amo%>win NI "weight: 10" ;
! Instruments
@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Ins:@R.noun.Indep@%>i2^T2Ckan NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Ins2:@R.noun.Indep@%>â^INSkan NI "weight: 10" ;
@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Ins3:@R.noun.Indep@%>i2^T2Ckâkan NI "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VTI_AgentiveSuffix
! Agentive o- ... -(amo)w
@R.infl.VTI-ae@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VTI-ae@%>w NA "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VTI-io@%>w NA "weight: 10" ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@+Der/Age:@R.infl.VTI-m@%>am%>ow NA "weight: 10" ;

! VTA derivation

LEXICON VTA_Class
+V+TA:0 VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA_Diminutive
0 VTA_Derivation ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@+Der/Dim+V+TA:@D.diminutive.DIM@@P.diminutive.DIM@ VTA_Inflection "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VTA_Derivation
0 VTA_Inflection ;
@P.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Antip:@P.infl.VAI-ae@%>iwê VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Rflx:@P.infl.VAI-io@%>i2so VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@+Der/Rcpr:@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@%>i2to VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@D.morf.amaw@@P.morf.amaw@+Der/Bnf:@D.morf.amaw@@P.morf.amaw@%>amaw VTA_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Dtr:@P.infl.VAI-ae@%>i2^T2Ckê VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/MedPass:@P.infl.VAI-io@%>o VAI_Class "weight: 10" ;
! Nominalization
@R.noun.Indep@+Der/Goa:@R.noun.Indep@%>âkan NA "weight: 10" ;

!! Inflection

!! VII Inflection

LEXICON VII_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@@R.person.NULL@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@@R.person.NULL@ VII_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VII_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VII_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VII_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_IndependentSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_IndependentSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_ConjunctSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_ConjunctSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_ConditionalSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII-v_IndependentSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-v_IND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_IND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_IND_SG
+3Sg:%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_IND_PL
+3Pl:%>w%>a VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýiw%>a VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-v_CNJ_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_CNJ_SG
+3Sg:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_CNJ_PL
+3Pl:%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýik%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-v_COND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_COND_SG
+3Sg:%>ki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýiki VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_COND_PL
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýikwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_IndependentSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-n_IND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_IND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_IND_SG
+3Sg:0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_IND_PL
+3Pl:%>wa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýiw%>a VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-n_CNJ_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_CNJ_SG
+3Sg:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_CNJ_PL
+3Pl:%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýik%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VII-n_COND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_COND_SG
+3Sg:%>ki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýiki VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_COND_PL
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýikwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;

!! VAI inflection

LEXICON VAI_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@ VAI_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VAI_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VAI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VAI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Imp@+Imp:@R.order.Imp@ VAI_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI_IndependentSuffixes
@R.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI-ae_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@ VAI-io_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAI-n_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@ VAI-m_IndependentSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VAI-ae_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VAI-ae_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VAI-ae_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2aw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>w%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>n2iwan VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>n2iwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VAI-io_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VAI-io_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VAI-io_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VAI-io_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2aw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>w%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>n2âniwan VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>n2âniwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VAI-n_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VAI-n_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VAI-n_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VAI-n_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>inânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>inaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>inâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
